Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,116
Cross-examination by adverse party.

Any person who has furnished information on which such report or finding is based may be cross-examined by the adverse party, but the fact that his testimony is not obtainable shall not render the report or finding inadmissible, unless the trial court finds that substantial injustice would be done to the adverse party by its admission.

Laws 1951, c. 57, § 2, p. 190.